Hawaii statutes.
[§607-14.9] Actions to enforce covenants
not to compete. In a civil action which involves the interpretation or
enforcement of an agreement or alleged agreement which purportedly restricts an
employee from competing with an employer, or former employer, or working for a
competitor of an employer or former employer, any employee or former employee
who prevails shall be awarded reasonable attorneys' fees and costs. [L 1992, c
56, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next